Tennessee, session 114, HB0670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-13-108(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "four hundred fifty feet (450')" and substituting "four hundred feet (400')".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0670
002701
- 1 -